Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4597.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; UNIFIED 911 CENTER AWARENESS PLATFORM.new text end new text begin $1,750,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for a grant to the Metropolitan Emergency Services Board to develop and implement a unified 911 center awareness platform that allows 911 centers to communicate and coordinate emergency responses across jurisdictional boundaries in real time. The grant recipient may also use the grant to fund two years of maintenance of the platform. new text end